Wyoming statutes. Title 42 Welfare
Article 1. In General
§ 42-2-106.
Approval or disapproval of application; notification of applicant; amount and form of assistance and services.

Based upon the eligibility of an applicant, the department shall approve or disapprove each application for public assistance or social services filed with its field offices pursuant to W.S.

42-2-105

and shall notify the applicant of its decision. Eligibility determinations for public assistance under this chapter shall be made separately from eligibility determinations for medical assistance under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act.

Upon approval and in accordance with this article and its rules and regulations, the department shall determine the form, amount and commencement date of public assistance and social services for each approved application. In determining the amount of public assistance and social services for applicants who receive a housing subsidy, for households with a supplemental security income recipient or for unmarried minor parent applicants, the department shall take into consideration the supplied shelter tables as established in its rules and regulations.

In any assistance program under this chapter for which income is the criterion or one (1) of the criteria for assistance payments, compensation received for a veteran’s service connected disability shall not be counted in determining income if that compensation on an annual basis is not more than the poverty level for the applicant as determined by the federal office of management and budget.

When the department approves an application for public assistance under the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) program, it shall inform the approved applicant of the opportunity to continue to receive benefits under the program while participating in an approved educational program, provided the person is accepted into the approved educational program and otherwise continues to meet eligibility requirements of both programs.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 88, §§ 17, 23; C.S. 1945, §§ 25-117, 25-122; Laws 1951, ch. 98, § 8; W.S. 1957, §§ 42-8, 42-14; Laws 1965, ch. 90, § 4; 1971, ch. 221, §§ 6, 9; 1975, ch. 84, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 42-1-107, 42-1-111; Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 2; 1986, ch. 72, § 1; 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 1990, ch. 120, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1993, ch. 169, § 1; 1996, ch. 111, § 2; 1997, ch. 196, § 1; 1999, ch. 102, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Paying for Nursing Home Care: Medicaid and Planned Poverty,” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 471 (1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Personal injury recovery as affecting eligibility for, or duty to reimburse, public welfare assistance, 80 ALR3d 772.

Eligibility for welfare benefits, under maximum-assets limitations, as affected by expenditures or disposal of assets, 19 ALR4th 146.

Eligibility for welfare benefits as affected by claimant's status as trust beneficiary, 21 ALR4th 729.

§ 42-2-107.
Payment of assistance; custodian for incompetent recipients.

Public assistance and social services approved under this article:

May be provided in the form of a performance payment or other financial assistance, in the home of the applicant, in an institution or in any other manner or form determined appropriate by rule and regulation of the department;

Shall be provided to the recipient until terminated or modified pursuant to this article;

Shall be provided to qualified recipients who move to Wyoming from other states, except the amount of the performance payment or other financial assistance for the first twelve (12) months of eligibility in Wyoming may, at the option of the department, be the lesser of:

The amount of assistance for which the recipient would be entitled in Wyoming; or

The amount of the assistance the recipient would be receiving in the state of prior residence.

A performance payment or any other form of public assistance shall be payable to the recipient or to a custodian or a vendor on behalf of the recipient. If the recipient is determined incompetent for purposes of using the public assistance provided under this article in the most beneficial manner, the amount may be payable to a custodian of the recipient. Subject to approval of the department, the custodian may receive and dispose of the public assistance on behalf of the recipient and shall report quarterly to the department providing a detailed accounting of his management of the amounts received under this subsection. The department shall review the report, determine if the conduct of the custodian is in the best interests of the recipient and file a copy of the report in the recipient’s case record.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 88, § 24; 1945, ch. 44, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 25-123; Laws 1947, ch. 164, § 6; 1949, ch. 50, § 4; 1951, ch. 98, § 9; 1957, ch. 177, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 42-15; Laws 1965, ch. 90, § 5; 1967, ch. 195, § 3; 1969, ch. 133, § 1; 1971, ch. 221, § 10; W.S. 1977, § 42-1-112; Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 2; 1981, ch. 118, § 1; 1986, ch. 83, § 1; 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1993, ch. 169, § 1; 1997, ch. 196, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to guardians, see title 3.

§ 42-2-108.
Continuous assistance to recipient changing residence to another county; assistance provided to nonresidents; termination upon leaving state.

The department shall provide for the continuous and uninterrupted receipt of approved public assistance and social services by any eligible recipient changing his residence from one (1) county to another county in the state until otherwise terminated or modified in accordance with this article.

Any transient or nonresident of the state may receive public assistance or social services provided under this article if approved in accordance with this article. The department may require the transient or nonresident to pay his transportation and expenses if he possesses property, income or other resources other than personal effects necessary for decency and health.

Public assistance or social services shall be terminated in the manner prescribed by rule and regulation of the department for any recipient moving to another state.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 88, §§ 24, 34, 38; 1945, ch. 44, § 2; C.S. 1945, §§ 25-123, 25-130, 25-133; Laws 1947, ch. 164, § 6; 1949, ch. 50, § 4; 1951, ch. 98, §§ 9, 12; 1957, ch. 177, §§ 6, 8; W.S. 1957, §§ 42-15, 42-22, 42-25; Laws 1965, ch. 90, § 5; 1967, ch. 195, §§ 3, 4, 6; 1969, ch. 133, § 1; 1971, ch. 221, §§ 10, 17, 18; 1975, ch. 84, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 42-1-112, 42-1-119, 42-1-124; Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 2; 1981, ch. 118, § 1; 1986, ch. 83, § 1; 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 1991, ch. 161, § 3.

§ 42-2-109.
Review of assistance and services; termination or modification; notice to department of change in assets.

Public assistance and social services provided under this article shall be reviewed at least once each year, except for recipients enrolled in an approved educational program which shall be reviewed once every six (6) months. An approved educational program under this section shall be limited to educational courses not to exceed the baccalaureate degree level. After review, the department may continue, modify or terminate public assistance and social services in accordance with the circumstances of the recipient and the provisions of this article. Review of recipients in an approved educational program pursuant to this subsection shall require that recipients:

To maintain a “C” or equivalent cumulative grade point average in the approved educational program;

Be enrolled as a full-time student, provided:

To qualify as a full-time student under this paragraph, the student shall be enrolled for a minimum of twelve (12) credit hours per semester or activities that equal twelve (12) credit hours as defined by the institution and complete twenty-four (24) or more credit hours per year or activities that equal twenty-four (24) credit hours per year as defined by the institution in an approved educational program;

A full-time student qualifying under this paragraph is exempt from any work or community service requirement under this article, except as provided in paragraph (iii) of this subsection;

To qualify under this paragraph, the full-time student shall be a Wyoming resident in accordance with guidelines and criteria prescribed by rule and regulation of the department.

From the end of the spring semester to the beginning of the fall semester, work at least thirty-two (32) hours per week for at least ten (10) weeks or successfully complete six (6) credit hours. The department may waive this requirement for good cause.

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 238, § 2.

Upon gaining possession of any property, income or other assets after receiving any public assistance and social services under this article, a recipient shall notify the department not later than ten (10) calendar days after becoming aware of the change in circumstances. The amount of public assistance and social services provided to the recipient shall be accordingly terminated or modified pursuant to rule and regulation of the department. The department shall exempt not more than two (2) licensed motor vehicles from personal assets in determining eligibility for any household under the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) program.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 196, § 2.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 88, §§ 28, 29; C.S. 1945, §§ 25-128, 25-129; W.S. 1957, §§ 42-20, 42-21; Laws 1969, ch. 131, § 4; 1971, ch. 221, §§ 15, 16; W.S. 1977, §§ 42-1-117, 42-1-118; Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 2; 1981, ch. 118, § 1; 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1993, ch. 169, § 1; 1995, ch. 131, § 1; 1996, ch. 111, § 2; 1997, ch. 196, § 1; 2005, ch. 238, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 9, § 1; 2013 ch. 193, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 74, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 179, § 1, effective March 6, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added the last full sentence in the introductory language in (a); rewrote (a)(ii), revising enrollment requirements; rewrote (a)(iii), revising work requirements; repealed former (a)(iv), which pertained to satisfaction and possible waiver of the work requirement; and in (b) twice substituted “fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000.00)” for “twelve thousand dollars ($12,000.00).”

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (b), deleted “Effective July 1, 1996,” at the beginning of the third sentence, deleted “with a market value of less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000.00),” after “motor vehicle” in the third sentence, and deleted “provided the aggregate value of both vehicles does not exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000.00)” at the end.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013,
substituted “supplemental nutrition assistance programs”
for “food stamp programs” in (b).

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in (b), in the first sentence substituted “assets” for “resources” and “shall notify the department not later than ten (10) calendar days after becoming” for “immediately notify the department as he becomes,”
in the second sentence substituted “exempt not more than two (2) licensed motor vehicles” for “allow the exclusion of one (1) duly registered and licensed motor vehicle” and “assets” for “resources,” and at the end of the section substituted “program” for “and supplemental nutrition assistance programs. Married couples shall be allowed a second duly registered and licensed motor vehicle.”

The 2017 amendment

deleted the former third sentence of (a) which read: “The department shall provide a report to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee no later than October 1, 2005, and annually thereafter, with respect to the number of new individuals enrolled in an approved education program under this section and how long each new student has been a Wyoming resident at the time of enrollment.”

Laws 2017, ch. 179, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 17, 2017.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Eligibility for welfare benefits as affected by claimant's status as trust beneficiary, 21 ALR4th 729.

§ 42-2-110.
Administrative and judicial review.

An applicant or recipient whose application is not acted upon within a reasonable time following the date of application or who is aggrieved by any determination for the provision, amount, modification or termination of public assistance and social services under this article may appeal to the department in a manner and form prescribed by the department. The department shall provide the applicant or recipient reasonable notice in accordance with its rules and regulations and shall provide opportunity for hearing pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. Following conclusion of the hearing, the department shall render a final decision.

A decision of the department may be appealed to the district court as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 88, § 27; 1941, ch. 125, § 11; C.S. 1945, § 25-126; W.S. 1957, § 42-18; Laws 1969, ch. 131, § 2; 1971, ch. 221, § 13; 1975, ch. 84, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 42-1-115; Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 2; 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 1991, ch. 161, § 3.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Hearing may be denied under state statutes where not mandatedby federal regulations. —

Where a hearing is not mandated by federal regulations, it may be denied under state statutes. Walker v. Karpan, 726 P.2d 82,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 615

(Wyo. 1986).

Claimant not entitled to hearing to determine legislative facts.—

The requirement of due process of law that an opportunity be afforded to be heard on issues of adjudicative facts does not extend to hearings on legislative facts. Where the only questions of fact which an aid-to-dependent-children claimant claimed could be determined at the fair hearing were: (1) that the new assistance unit factors were not properly promulgated under the Administrative Procedure Act; and (2) that the need level, which ultimately determined the amount of the benefit for a given assistance unit, was not properly established, the “facts” which would have been resolved in a hearing were legislative facts. Walker v. Karpan, 726 P.2d 82,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 615

(Wyo. 1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sufficiency of notice or hearing required prior to termination of welfare benefits, 47 ALR3d 277.

§ 42-2-111.
Prohibited disclosure and use of records; penalty; judicial discovery.

Except as provided in this section, no person shall disclose, receive, use or knowingly permit or participate in the use of any information derived from records maintained pursuant to law or acquired in the performance of duties under this article for purposes not directly related to the administration of this article.

A violation of subsection (a) of this section is a misdemeanor.

In accordance with the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, any county or district court may subpoena the records maintained under this article and require the testimony of personnel involved in the administration of this article which is pertinent to any proceeding involving the:

Custody, welfare or interest of any minor receiving public assistance and social services under this article;

Termination of parental rights as provided by law;

Prosecution of any person for a crime connected with obtaining public assistance and social services;

Foreclosure of liens held by the department.

Upon request of a federal, state or local law enforcement officer as defined by federal statute and W.S. 9-1-701(a)(vi), the department may furnish the requesting officer the current address of any recipient under the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) program if the requesting officer:

Furnishes the department with the name of the recipient; and

Notifies the department that the recipient:

Is a fleeing felon as described in paragraph (iii) of this subsection or has information necessary for the requesting officer to conduct the officer’s official duties; and

The location or apprehension of the recipient is within the requesting officer’s duties.

For purposes of this section, a fleeing felon is defined as an individual who:

Is fleeing to avoid prosecution, custody or confinement after conviction, under the laws of the jurisdiction from which the individual flees, for a crime or attempt to commit a crime, which is a felony under the laws of the jurisdiction from which the individual flees, or which, in the case of the state of New Jersey, is a high misdemeanor, or is violating a condition of probation or parole imposed under federal or state law; and

Whose conduct as described in this subsection has not been pardoned by the president of the United States or the governor of the jurisdiction from which the felon flees.

If the department learns of the location of a fleeing felon or of an individual who has an outstanding warrant for his arrest, the department shall notify the appropriate law enforcement agency. The department shall limit disclosure under this section by providing only the current address of the recipient under the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) program.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 125, § 12; C.S. 1945, § 25-127; Laws 1947, ch. 164, § 8; 1951, ch. 98, § 11; 1955, ch. 126, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 42-19; Laws 1969, ch. 131, § 3; 1971, ch. 221, § 14; 1975, ch. 84, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 42-1-116; Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 2; 1981, ch. 118, § 1; 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 1997, ch. 196, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to penalties for misdemeanors, see §

6-10-103

.

As to depositions and discovery, see Rules 26 through 37, W.R.C.P.

Admissibility of records of welfare department. —

See Price ex rel. Laramie County Dep't of Pub. Welfare v. Pearson, 447 P.2d 501,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 1968) (decided prior to 1988 revision).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Admissibility of records or report of welfare department or agency relating to payment to or financial condition of particular person, 42 ALR2d 752.

Communications to social worker as privileged, 50 ALR3d 563.

Confidentiality of records as to recipients of public welfare, 54 ALR3d 768.

§ 42-2-112.
Misrepresentation; penalties; recovery, termination or modification of assistance and services.

No person shall knowingly make a false statement or misrepresentation, fail to disclose a material fact, aid, abet or conspire with any other person in obtaining any form of supplemental nutrition assistance benefit under the supplemental nutrition assistance program.

No person shall knowingly make a false statement or misrepresentation, fail to disclose a material fact, aid, abet or conspire with any other person in obtaining any commodity under the supplemental nutrition assistance program.

No person shall knowingly trade or otherwise dispose of any supplemental nutrition assistance benefit received under the supplemental nutrition assistance program, except to a federally authorized food retailer.

No person shall knowingly sell any form of supplemental nutrition assistance benefit to any other person.

No person shall knowingly give, sell, trade or otherwise dispose of any commodity obtained under the supplemental nutrition assistance program to any other person.

No person shall knowingly buy, trade or otherwise obtain any form of supplemental nutrition assistance benefit from any other person, except as authorized by law.

No person shall knowingly buy, trade or otherwise obtain any commodity under the supplemental nutrition assistance program from any other person, except as authorized by law.

No person shall knowingly make a false statement or misrepresentation, knowingly fail to disclose a material fact, aid, abet or conspire with any other person in obtaining public welfare benefits.

No person shall knowingly directly or indirectly deprive himself of any property, income or other resources in order to qualify for public welfare benefits.

Any person violating this section is guilty of:

A felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both, if the value of the commodity, supplemental nutrition assistance benefit or other public welfare benefit under this article is five hundred dollars ($500.00) or more; or

A misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, if the value of the commodity, supplemental nutrition assistance benefit or other public welfare benefit under this article is less than five hundred dollars ($500.00).

In addition to the penalty imposed under subsection (k) of this section, the amount of public welfare benefits improperly provided due to any violation of this section may be recovered by appropriate action which shall be instituted by the department or by the attorney general on behalf of the department.

The department shall disapprove, terminate or modify the public welfare benefits to any applicant or recipient who has been found guilty of violating this section until any court sentence under this section is completed and full restitution is made to the department. Public welfare benefits shall not be denied to any minor because of violation of this section by a parent or guardian.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 88, § 29; C.S. 1945, § 45-129; W.S. 1957, §§ 42-13.1, 42-21, 42-23.2; Laws 1969, ch. 131, § 4; 1971, ch. 213, § 2; ch. 221, § 16; 1973, ch. 193, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 42-1-110, 42-1-118, 42-1-122; Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 2; 1981, ch. 118, § 1; 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1993, ch. 169, § 1; 1995, ch. 191, § 1; 2013 ch. 193, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “supplemental nutrition assistance” for “food stamp” everywhere it appears in (a) through (g) and (k).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Criminal liability. —

See Hildebrand v. State, 491 P.2d 741,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 271

(Wyo. 1971).

Cited

in

McEwan v. State, 2013 WY 158, 314 P.3d 1160,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Dec 23, 2013); Shafer v. State, 2015 WY 38,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Mar. 9, 2015).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Criminal liability under state laws in connection with application for, or receipt of, public welfare payments, 22 ALR4th 534.

Validity of statutes or regulations denying welfare benefits to claimants who transfer property for less than its full value, 24 ALR4th 215.

§ 42-2-113.
Assignment or transfer of assistance and services; exemption from legal process.

Any assignment or transfer of public assistance and social services provided under this article is void.

Except as authorized under W.S. 42-2-112(m), public assistance and social services provided by this article are exempt from levy, execution, attachment, garnishment or other legal process or debt collection remedy. A waiver of exemptions provided by this subsection is void.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 88, § 26; C.S. 1945, § 25-125; W.S. 1957, § 42-17; Laws 1971, ch. 221, § 12; W.S. 1977, § 42-1-114; Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 2000, ch. 48, § 2.

Earned income credit is not “public assistance.” —

Debtor's earned income credit was not exempt from garnishment as “public assistance,” since the credit was not a welfare grant but an incentive to work. Trudeau v. Royal (In re Trudeau), 237 B.R. 803, 1999 Bankr. LEXIS 1075 (B.A.P. 10th Cir. 1999).

§ 42-2-114.
Reimbursement of federal government.

The department shall reimburse the federal government as required by federal law.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 164, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 42-36; Laws 1971, ch. 221, § 23; W.S. 1977, § 42-1-130; Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 2; 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1997, ch. 196, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of public to reimbursements of old-age assistance payments from estate of recipient, 29 ALR2d 731.

Right of public to reimbursements from relatives of recipient of old-age assistance payments, 29 ALR2d 731.

Constitutionality of statutory provision requiring reimbursement of public by child for financial assistance to aged parents, 75 ALR3d 1159.

Personal injury recovery as affecting eligibility for, or duty to reimburse, public welfare assistance, 80 ALR3d 772.

Requirement, under 42 USC § 602(a)(28), that state reimburse AFDC recipient for child support payments collected on recipient's behalf, 70 ALR Fed 941.